Arkansas, session 2025, SB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-62-302(a), concerning the authority of
the boards of trustees of the University of Arkansas, Arkansas State
University system, University of Central Arkansas, Henderson State
University, Arkansas Tech University, and Southern Arkansas University, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Subject to and in accordance with the terms of this subchapter,
the boards of trustees of the University of Arkansas, Arkansas State
University system, University of Central Arkansas, Henderson State
University, Arkansas Tech University, and Southern Arkansas University,
respectively, are authorized and empowered as public agencies of the State of
*CRH296*
03/20/2025 3:04:53 PM CRH296

SB545
Arkansas to:
(1) Construct buildings, structures, parking facilities, or
other improvements which the board of trustees deems proper or suitable for
the school and to purchase sites therefor, if necessary;
(2) Purchase for such purpose buildings already constructed and
the tracts of land on which they are situated;
(3) Reconstruct, enlarge or repair, and equip any buildings or
structures of the university, including, but not limited to, buildings or
structures constructed or purchased under authority of this subchapter; and
(4) Purchase for such purposes and pay the expense of tearing
down, removing to the school, reconstructing, and equipping houses,
buildings, or structures; and
(5) Acquire, improve, install, license, lease, or equip other
facilities, improvements, leaseholds, infrastructure, technologies, or any
other tangible or intangible properties that the board of trustees deems
proper or suitable for the school.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-62-305(a), concerning the authorization
of the board of trustees to issue negotiable interest bearing notes or bonds,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6) Any other revenues derived from the operation of the board
and the campuses governed thereby, excluding any moneys that are derived from
tax collections.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-62-311 is amended to read as follows:
6-62-311. Rents, tolls, fees, etc. — Rules authorized.
A board of trustees is further authorized and empowered to fix the
rents, tolls, fees, other charges, activity fees, and gate receipts of
athletic contests and to make and to enforce the rules with reference to or
in connection with any building, or structure, facility, improvement,
infrastructure, leasehold, technology, or property authorized to be
constructed, reconstructed, enlarged, repaired, improved, installed,
licensed, leased, or equipped and with reference to the use thereof as the
board may deem desirable for the welfare of the institution or its student
body.

03/20/2025 3:04:53 PM CRH296